Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-15] Civil remedies. (a) An
educational institution has a right of action against an athlete agent or a
former student-athlete for damages caused by a violation of this chapter. In
an action under this section, the court may award to the prevailing party costs
and reasonable attorney's fees.

(b) Damages of an educational institution
under subsection (a) include losses and expenses incurred because, as a result
of the conduct of an athlete agent or former student-athlete, the educational
institution was injured by a violation of this chapter or was penalized,
disqualified, or suspended from participation in athletics by a national
association for the promotion or regulation of athletics, by an athletic
conference, or by reasonable self-imposed disciplinary action taken to mitigate
sanctions likely to be imposed by such an organization.

(c) A right of action under this section does
not accrue until the educational institution discovers or by the exercise of
reasonable diligence would have discovered the violation by the athlete agent
or former student-athlete.

(d) Any liability of the athlete agent or the
former student-athlete under this section is several and not joint.

(e) This chapter does not restrict rights,
remedies, or defenses of any person under law or equity. [L 2007, c 248, pt of
§2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next